Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 2 Federal Navigation and Flood Control Projects

46-2-1.
Application for federal harbor appropriations.

The director of the department of environmental management may apply to Congress, whenever he or she deems it necessary, for appropriations for protecting and improving any harbor in the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 118, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 144, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-1

.

46-2-2.
Agreements by state to satisfy federal conditions as to projects.

The director of the department of environmental management is authorized to negotiate, cooperate, and enter into agreements in behalf of this state with the United States in order to satisfy the conditions imposed by the United States authorizing any project for the improvement of navigation of any harbor or river and for the protection of property against damage by floods or by erosion, provided the project shall first have been approved by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2263, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-2

.

46-2-3.
Agreements to hold federal government harmless.

The director of the department of environmental management with the approval of the governor, is authorized to give assurances that the state will hold and save the United States harmless from claims and damages resulting from any improvement or protection project and to enter into any agreement with the federal government for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2263, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-3

.

46-2-4.
Applications for federal aid.

Whenever it shall be necessary to obtain cooperation, assistance, or funds from the United States of America in the form of loans, advances, grants, subsidies, and otherwise, directly or indirectly, for any of the purposes enumerated in §

46-2-2

, the director of the department of environmental management, with the approval of the governor, may make all necessary applications therefor to the United States or any agency thereof. All applications shall be made in writing in the name of the state, and shall be signed by the director of the department of environmental management, and shall be countersigned by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2263, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-4

.

46-2-5.
Payment of state contributions.

Where an appropriation has been made by the general assembly for that purpose, the director of the department of environmental management, with the approval of the governor, is authorized to provide for the payment by the state of the cash contribution required by the United States for the improvement or protection project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2263, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-5

.

46-2-6.
Powers supplemental.

The powers granted in §§

46-2-2

—

46-2-5

shall be deemed to be in addition to and not in derogation of all the powers previously vested in the director of the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2263, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-6

.

46-2-7.
Agreements by cities and towns to meet federal conditions.

Any city or town is authorized to negotiate, cooperate, and enter into agreements with the United States and the state in order to satisfy the conditions imposed by the United States in authorizing any project for the improvement of navigation of any harbor or river and for the protection of property against damage by floods or by erosion, provided the project shall have been approved by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2354, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-7

.

46-2-8.
Joint undertakings of cities and towns.

Where any improvement or protection project is located within two (2) or more cities or towns, the cities or towns are authorized to undertake jointly any action as is authorized in §

46-2-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2354, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-8

.

46-2-9.
Condemnation by cities and towns — Appropriations and borrowing.

In order to carry out the intent of §§

46-2-7

—

46-2-11

any city or town is authorized to acquire by condemnation any land, easements, or rights-of-way required for the improvement or protection project, and any city or town is authorized to make appropriations and to expend funds, in the manner provided by law, for the improvement or protection project, and to issue bonds or other evidences of debt, subject to statutory limitation, for the improvement or protection project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2354, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-9

.

46-2-10.
Agreement by town or city to hold federal government harmless.

The town council of any town and the city council of any city are authorized to give assurances that the respective town or city will hold and save the United States harmless from claims and damages resulting from the improvement or protection project and to enter into agreement with the United States for these purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2354, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-10

.

46-2-11.
State contributions where appropriation made by city or town.

Where an appropriation has been made by any city or town council for that purpose, and where an appropriation has also been made by the general assembly for that purpose, the director of the department of environmental management, with the approval of the governor, is authorized to provide for the payment by the state of not more than one-half (1/2) of the cash contribution required by the United States, for the improvement or protection project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2354, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-11

.

46-2-12.
Acquisition of land for flood control projects authorized.

Whenever the council of any city, or the electors of any town qualified to vote upon any proposition for the imposition of taxes or for the expenditure of money, shall have voted at a meeting duly called for that purpose to cooperate with the state and the federal government in any flood control project in the city or town, the city or town may acquire by gift, purchase, or by eminent domain proceedings as provided in §§

46-2-12

—

46-2-26

, land or other real property or any interest, estate, or right therein as is necessary or advantageous to the establishment, acquisition, construction, development, betterment, or maintenance of the project and from time to time to relocate and construct highways, roads, and streets, including bridges and approaches and other structures, and including water pipes, petroleum pipes, gas pipes, sewers and sewer lines, communication and power lines, railroad tracks and bridges, and other structures, tailraces, raceway conduits, and extensions and connections, incidental thereto, and for the construction or reconstruction of dams and pumping stations, both publicly and privately owned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-12

.

46-2-13.
Payment for property taken.

Whenever any property or estate or rights of property shall be taken under the provisions of §

46-2-12

, the owner thereof, including all persons having property rights therein, shall be paid therefor according to their respective interests, by the city or town taking the same.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-13

.

46-2-14.
Filing of plat and certificate — Notice to owners.

The city or town, taking any property, estate, or right of property under the provisions of §§

46-2-12

—

46-2-26

, shall first cause a plat with a description thereof to be made, which, with a certificate of the taking of the same, shall contain a list of the owners thereof and of the persons interested therein, so far as the same may be known to the town or city taking the same, and which shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court for the county where the property or estate is located; and upon the filing of the certificate, the taking shall thereupon become forthwith effective and the clerk shall forthwith issue a notice to the several persons named therein which shall contain the substance of the certificate, and also a notice of a time and place when the persons may appear in the court and be heard in reference to the question of the damages sustained by reason of the taking; and the clerk shall, for four (4) successive weeks thereafter, cause to be advertised in each issue of some newspaper published in the county a copy of the notice, requiring all persons interested in the premises to appear at said time and place, if they see fit, to be heard in the premises. The personal notice upon known parties shall be served as soon as may be, and at least twenty (20) days before the time of the hearing, by some officer authorized to serve process or by some disinterested person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-14

.

46-2-15.
Appraisal and award of damages.

At the time mentioned in the notice given under the authority of §

46-2-14

, or at such adjournment from that time as the court shall order, the court shall appoint three (3) suitable persons to be commissioners to appraise the damages sustained by any person whose property, estate, or rights of property shall have been taken for either or any of the purposes authorized in §

46-2-12

; the commissioners, after being duly sworn to the faithful discharge of their trust and giving due notice to the parties in interest, shall proceed to hear the parties with their allegations and proofs, and to examine the premises, and shall make up and return their award in the premises to the clerk of the superior court from which they received their appointment, with their fees marked thereon, which fees, being first allowed by the court, shall be forthwith paid by the town or city taking the property, estate, or rights of property embraced in the award.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-15

.

46-2-16.
Examination of commissioners’ report — Jury trial on damages — Costs.

The clerk of the superior court shall open the report of the commissioners, and the report may be examined by any person interested therein; and any person or party aggrieved by any award of damages by the commissioners may claim a jury trial upon any item of damages thereby awarded, and may file his or her claim for the trial at any time within three (3) months from the opening of the report; and the claim shall stand for trial by jury as other cases upon the docket of the court, and shall be tried therein in every respect as other cases are there tried, including the right to except to rulings and to apply for new trials for cause; and execution may be awarded thereon as in other cases; but if the party claiming the jury trial shall not therein obtain an award for damages more favorable to him or her than that given by the commissioners, that party shall pay costs to the city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-16

.

46-2-17.
Amendment of proceedings.

Any proceeding in taking any property or estate or rights of property, or in claiming damages therefor, or other proceeding under the provisions of §§

46-2-12

—

46-2-26

, may at any stage of the proceeding, with the leave of the court, be amended upon such terms and conditions as to the court may appear to be just and proper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-17

.

46-2-18.
Judgment for damages.

Whenever the report of the commissioners shall be received by the court and no right of trial by jury shall be claimed thereon, the court shall enter judgment in favor of the several claimants for the damages awarded to them respectively; and so shall enter judgment upon the verdict of the jury, subject to the right to apply for new trials for cause, upon the rendition of the verdict; and the court shall forthwith grant execution upon those judgments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-18

.

46-2-19.
Damages for riparian rights.

If any land covered by tidewater is taken under §§

46-2-12

—

46-2-26

, then damages to the rights of every riparian owner and of every lessee of the land, if any, shall be awarded under the provisions hereof the same as for any other right of property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-19

.

46-2-20.
Acquisition of lands in other towns.

Any city or town may acquire by gift or purchase any lands or interests therein in any other city or town which are necessary for the construction and/or maintenance of the project and may appropriate such sum or sums as may be necessary therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-20

.

46-2-21.
Cooperation with federal government.

The city or town shall have full power and authority to cooperate with and assist the federal government in all matters relating to the planning, constructing, equipping, maintenance, and operation of the projects in the event that the federal government shall make any federal funds or federal assistance available therefor. The city or town, with the approval of the governor, is hereby authorized to accept, on behalf of the city or town, the provisions of the federal legislation, and may file written evidence of the acceptance with the federal government. Each such acceptance shall be duly signed by the city or town treasurer and countersigned by the governor.

The treasurer may enter into all necessary contracts and agreements with the federal government, or any agency thereof, necessary or incident to the carrying out of the flood control project or projects and may give assurance that it will hold and save harmless the United States and/or the state from claims for damages arising from construction works, and all the contracts and agreements shall be approved as to form by the attorney general and be signed by the city or town treasurer in behalf of the city or town and in the name of the state by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-21

.

46-2-22.
Compliance with federal and local rules.

The flood control project or projects shall be carried out and executed in all respects subject to the provisions of the appropriate federal law providing for the project, and the rules and regulations made pursuant thereto, and to such terms, conditions, rules, and regulations, not inconsistent with the federal law, as the city or town may, with the approval of the governor, establish to ensure the proper execution of the project or projects.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-22

.

46-2-23.
Maintenance and operation of works.

After the completion of the project, the city or town shall maintain and operate the flood control works.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-23

.

46-2-24.
Prevention of encroachments.

Each city or town shall prescribe regulations designed to prevent encroachments on the improved channels, and shall enforce the regulations, and shall take such means as may be necessary to prevent any encroachments upon the flood channel and conduit capacities to be provided by the improvements.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-24

.

46-2-25.
Apportionment of costs.

The total cost incurred under §

46-2-12

shall be borne by the city and town which shall have voted to cooperate with the state and the federal government in the flood control project; provided, however, that the state may share in the cost at a rate not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the cost.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-25

.

46-2-26.
Provisions additional.

Sections

46-2-12

—

46-2-26

shall be construed to be in addition to and an enlargement of the provisions of §§

46-2-7

—

46-2-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3662, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

46-2-26

.